New Jersey, session 222, S1976.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  In the event that a hospital provides medical transport services to a patient to or from another hospital using the hospitals own first aid, ambulance, or rescue squad or a first aid, ambulance, or rescue squad under contract with the hospital to provide medical transportation services, and the hospital reasonably determines that no alternative transport options, including transport using a private vehicle, are clinically appropriate for the patient, the hospital shall be prohibited from billing the patient for the inter-hospital medical transport services provided. b.    Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a hospital from billing a patients health benefits plan for any medical transport services provided. c.     (1)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a nonvolunteer first aid, ambulance, or rescue squad, including a first aid, ambulance, or rescue squad operated by or under contact with a hospital to provide medical transport services, from billing a patient or the patients health benefits plan, as appropriate, for medical transport directly to the nearest appropriate hospital following dispatch of the squad in response to a 9-1-1 emergency dispatch call. (2)   For the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, nearest appropriate hospital means the hospital in closest proximity to the site of a 9-1-1 emergency dispatch call that is: (a)   capable of providing the level of care appropriate to the patients treatment needs; and (b)   currently receiving patients. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.